North Carolina, session 2025, HB561.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Youth End Nicotine
Dependence Act."
SECTION 2. G.S. 143C-9-3(a1) reads as rewritten:
*H561-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(a1) Each year, the following amounts are appropriated from the Settlement Reserve Fund:
(i) the sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) from the Settlement Reserve Fund is
appropriated to The Golden L.E.A.F. (Long-Term Economic Advancement Foundation), Inc., a
nonprofit corporation, and these corporation and (ii) the sum of seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000) to the Tobacco Use Prevention Fund established under G.S. 143C-9-3.1. The
funds shall appropriated to The Golden L.E.A.F., Inc., are not be subject to G.S. 143C-6-23. The
remainder of the funds credited to the Settlement Reserve Fund each fiscal year shall be
transferred to the General Fund and included in General Fund availability as nontax revenue."
SECTION 3. Article 9 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143C-9-3.1. Tobacco Use Prevention Fund.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Department. – The Department of Health and Human Services.
(2) Fund. – The Tobacco Use Prevention Fund established under subsection (b)
of this section.
(b) Establishment and Purpose. – The Tobacco Use Prevention Fund is established as an
interest-bearing special fund in the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public
Health, Chronic Disease and Injury Section. The purpose of the Fund is to prevent the use of new
and emerging tobacco products, including electronic cigarettes, especially among youth and
people of childbearing age. The Fund shall consist of the amounts appropriated to the Fund from
the Settlement Reserve Fund pursuant to G.S. 143C-9-3(a1). Any balance remaining in the Fund
at the end of any fiscal year is carried forward in the Fund for the next succeeding fiscal year for
the purposes set forth in this section.
(c) Use of Moneys. – The Department is prohibited from expending moneys in the Fund
for any purposes other than the administrative purposes authorized by subsection (d) of this
section and the following:
(1) To fund local health departments through a regional infrastructure to provide
community-based education and training of youth leaders, schools, and local
agencies regarding Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
evidence-based tobacco use prevention and cessation interventions, including
interventions addressing e-cigarettes.
(2) To fund evidence-based media and education campaigns on the health risks
of tobacco use, including e-cigarettes.
(3) To increase military readiness of members in active military service in North
Carolina, including members of the North Carolina National Guard and
military reserve components, through tobacco use prevention and cessation
policy, systems, and environmental change.
(4) To provide grants to community colleges to support a healthy, tobacco-free
campus.
(5) To track tobacco use and exposure, including exposure to e-cigarettes and
emerging tobacco products, among young people and populations most at risk
for tobacco use.
(6) To provide technical assistance and oversight of regional tobacco use
prevention programs.
(7) To conduct an independent evaluation of the reach and effectiveness of the
State's tobacco use prevention programs.
(d) Fund Administration. – The Department shall exercise administrative control over the
Fund and may use up to ten percent (10%) of the amount appropriated to the Fund each fiscal
year from the Settlement Reserve Fund for administrative purposes. The Department shall
develop guidelines for administering the Fund that are consistent with this section.
Page 2 House Bill 561-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Annual Report. – Annually on March 1, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services
and the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditures made from the Fund during the preceding
fiscal year. The report shall identify each expenditure by recipient and purpose and shall indicate
the authority under this section for the expenditure."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 561-First Edition Page 3